Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1656
Petit jurors; how selected; summons or notice to report.

(1) Unless the judge or judges order that no jury be drawn, the jury commissioner shall draw petit jurors for a regular jury panel pursuant to this section.

(2) If the jury commissioner has previously drawn and investigated potential jurors for service during the jury term as provided in section 25-1655, the jury commissioner shall draw by chance the names of thirty such qualified jurors, or such other number as the judge or judges may otherwise direct, for each judge sitting with a jury, as petit jurors for such regular jury panel.

(3) If the jury commissioner has not previously drawn and investigated potential jurors for service during the jury term as provided in section 25-1655, the jury commissioner shall draw and investigate potential jurors from the master key list in the same manner as provided in section 25-1655. The jury commissioner shall draw and investigate such number of potential jurors as the jury commissioner deems necessary to arrive at a list of thirty qualified jurors or such other number of qualified jurors as the judge or judges shall direct for each judge sitting with a jury.

(4) After drawing the names pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the jury commissioner shall:

(a) Serve a summons pursuant to section 25-1660 on each person whose name was drawn if the jury commissioner uses the two-step qualifying and summoning system; or

(b) If the jury commissioner has not already done so in the summons or by another method of notification, notify each person whose name was drawn of the date and time to report for jury service if the jury commissioner uses the one-step qualifying and summoning system.

Laws 1980, LB 733, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 329, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 39;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1641;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 13.